Washington statutes.
RCW 18.340.005

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Authority" means any agency, board, commission, or other authority for issuance of a license, certificate, registration, or permit under this title. "Authority" does not include the department of labor and industries, or the department of financial institutions with respect to escrow agent licensure under chapter 18.44 RCW.

(2) "License" means a license, certificate, registration, or permit to perform professional services.

[ 2023 c 165 s 3.]

NOTES:

Short title—Finding—Intent—2023 c 165: See notes following RCW 18.340.020.